Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
PART 2 Temporary Disability Compensation Program

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 283, § 3, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that this part became effective July 1, 2001, only upon ratification of a constitutional amendment by the voters at the 2000 November general election. The constitutional amendment (Ga. L. 2000, p. 1999) was approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting at the general election held on November 7, 2000.

45-9-100.
Purpose.

The purpose of this part is to implement the constitutional amendment ratified November 7, 2000, authorizing the General Assembly to provide a program of compensation for law enforcement officers who become physically disabled, but not permanently disabled, as a result of physical injury incurred in the line of duty and caused by a willful act of violence and for firefighters who become physically disabled, but not permanently disabled, as a result of physical injury incurred in the line of duty while fighting a fire, which program shall entitle an injured law enforcement officer or firefighter to receive monthly compensation from the state in an amount equal to such person’s regular compensation for the period of time that the law enforcement officer or firefighter is physically unable to perform the duties of his or her employment, not exceeding 12 months, and to provide certain exceptions and limitations with respect to such program of compensation.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-9-101

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 283, § 2; Ga. L. 2002, p. 660, § 4(21); Ga. L. 2002, p. 1259, § 11(21); Code 1981, §

45-9-100

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2008, p. 470, § 1/SB 254.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, former Code Section 45-9-100, as enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 768, § 2, was redesignated as Code Section 45-9-70, and the Code Section 45-9-100 designation was reserved.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2008, p. 470, § 2/SB 254, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section shall apply to all incidents occurring on or after July 1, 2008.

45-9-101.
Definitions.

As used in this part, the term:

“Commission” means the Georgia State Indemnification Commission created in Code Section 45-9-83.

“Department” means the Department of Administrative Services.

“Firefighter” means:

Any person who is employed as a professional firefighter on a full-time or part-time basis by any municipal, county, or state government fire department certified in writing by the Georgia Firefighter Standards and Training Council pursuant to Code Section 25-3-22 employing three or more firefighters and who has the responsibility of preventing and suppressing fires, protecting life and property, enforcing municipal, county, and state fire prevention codes, enforcing any law pertaining to the prevention and control of fires or who performs any acts or actions while on duty or when responding to a fire or emergency during any fire or other emergency or while performing duties intended to protect life and property;

Any individual serving as an officially recognized or designated member of a legally organized volunteer fire department certified in writing by the Georgia Volunteer Fire Service Council pursuant to Code Section 25-3-22 who performs any acts or actions while on duty and when responding to a fire or emergency during any fire or other emergency or while performing duties intended to protect life and property; or

Any employee at the State Forestry Commission whose job duties include fire mitigation.

“Full-time” means an employee who regularly works 30 hours or more each week.

“In the line of duty” means:

With respect to a volunteer firefighter, while on duty and performing duties during any fire or other emergency or performing duties intended to protect life and property; or

With respect to a law enforcement officer or firefighter, while on duty and performing services for and receiving compensation from the law enforcement or fire service agency which employs such officer or firefighter, while off duty and responding to any situation which would save a life or preserve the peace, or while preventing or attempting to prevent the commission of a crime or fire. A law enforcement officer or firefighter who is performing duties for and receiving compensation from a private employer at the time of such officer’s or firefighter’s bodily injury, but not permanent disability, shall not be considered in the line of duty if the officer or firefighter is entitled to workers’ compensation benefits from the private employer or the private employer’s insurer.

“Injured in the line of duty” means an injury which arises out of or in the course of employment in the line of duty; or, with respect to a firefighter of a legally organized volunteer fire department, such term means an injury while on duty and when responding to a fire or emergency with the volunteer fire department during any fire or other emergency or while performing duties intended to protect life and property. Going to or from work shall not be considered in the line of duty; and going to a legally organized volunteer fire department to begin a service of duty or traveling from such a fire department after duties have been completed or traveling from the scene of a fire, emergency, or other location where duties were being performed and have been completed shall not be considered in the line of duty.

“Law enforcement officer” means any agent or officer of this state, or a political subdivision or municipality thereof, who, as a full-time or part-time employee, is vested either expressly by law or by virtue of public employment or service with authority to enforce the criminal or traffic laws and whose duties include the preservation of public order, the protection of life and property, or the prevention, detection, or investigation of crime. Such term also includes the employees designated by the commissioner of community supervision who have the duty to supervise children adjudicated for a Class A designated felony act or Class B designated felony act after release from restrictive custody, as such terms are defined in Code Section 15-11-2, and the commissioner of juvenile justice pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection (i) of Code Section 49-4A-8 who have the duty to investigate and apprehend delinquent children, or the supervision of delinquent children under intensive supervision in the community, and any child with a pending juvenile court case alleging the child to be a child in need of services who has escaped from a facility under the jurisdiction of the Department of Juvenile Justice or who has broken the conditions of supervision. Such term also includes members of the Georgia National Guard, the composition of which is set forth in Code Section 38-2-3, who have been called into active state service by the Governor.

“Volunteer firefighter” means a person who is appointed and regularly enrolled as a volunteer with a legally organized fire department; who, as a volunteer firefighter, has and primarily performs the principal responsibility of preventing or suppressing fires; and who satisfies the requirements specified in subparagraph (a)(1)(D) of Code Section 25-3-23.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-9-102

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 283, § 2; Ga. L. 2002, p. 415, § 45; Ga. L. 2002, p. 660, § 2; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1259, § 9; Ga. L. 2003, p. 772, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 334, § 27-2/HB 501; Code 1981, §

45-9-101

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2008, p. 470, § 1/SB 254; Ga. L. 2009, p. 8, § 45/SB 46; Ga. L. 2013, p. 141, § 45/HB 79; Ga. L. 2013, p. 294, § 4-51/HB 242; Ga. L. 2014, p. 382, § 3/SB 324; Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 5-97/HB 310; Ga. L. 2020, p. 515, § 14/SB 342.

The 2013 amendments. —

The first 2013 amendment, effective April 24, 2013, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “State Forestry Commission” for “Georgia Forestry Commission” in the middle of subparagraph (3)(C) and substituted “the commissioner of juvenile justice” for “commissioner of juvenile justice of the Department of Juvenile Justice” in the middle of the second sentence of paragraph (7). The second 2013 amendment, effective January 1, 2014, in the second sentence of paragraph (7), deleted “of the Department of Juvenile Justice” preceding “pursuant to”, substituted “who have” for “, which employees have”, substituted “delinquent children and any child with a pending juvenile court case alleging the child to be a child in need of services who has” for “delinquent and unruly children who have” and substituted “who has broken” for “who have broken”. See editor’s note for applicability.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, inserted “, or the supervision of delinquent children under intensive supervision in the community,” in the middle of the second sentence of paragraph (7).

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, inserted “the commissioner of community supervision who have the duty to supervise children adjudicated for a Class A designated felony act or Class B designated felony act after release from restrictive custody, as such terms are defined in Code Section 15-11-2, and” near the middle of paragraph (7). See editor’s note for applicability.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, substituted “Volunteer Fire Service” for “Firefighter Standards and Training” in subparagraph (3)(B).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, Code Section 45-9-101, as enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 768, § 2, was redesignated as Code Section 45-9-71.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2008, p. 470, § 2/SB 254, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section shall apply to all incidents occurring on or after July 1, 2008.

Ga. L. 2013, p. 294, § 5-1/HB 242, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2014, and shall apply to all offenses which occur and juvenile proceedings commenced on and after such date. Any offense occurring before January 1, 2014, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such offense and shall be considered a prior adjudication for the purpose of imposing a disposition that provides for a different penalty for subsequent adjudications, of whatever class, pursuant to this Act. The enactment of this Act shall not affect any prosecutions for acts occurring before January 1, 2014, and shall not act as an abatement of any such prosecutions.”

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the amendment by this Act shall apply to sentences entered on or after July 1, 2015.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

45-9-102.
Payment of compensation; limitation; benefits subordinate to workers’ compensation benefits; appeal of decision.

Any law enforcement officer who becomes physically disabled, but not permanently disabled, on or subsequent to July 1, 2001, as a result of a physical injury incurred in the line of duty and caused by a willful act of violence committed by a person other than a fellow employee shall be entitled to receive compensation as provided in this Code section. Any firefighter who becomes physically disabled, but not permanently disabled, on or subsequent to July 1, 2001, as a result of a physical injury incurred in the line of duty while fighting a fire shall be entitled to receive compensation as provided in this Code section. The compensation shall be paid to eligible applicants by the commission from funds appropriated to the commission for such purpose.

Except as otherwise provided in this part, any law enforcement officer or firefighter injured in the line of duty as provided in subsection (a) of this Code section shall receive monthly compensation from the department in an amount equal to such person’s regular compensation for the period of time that the law enforcement officer or firefighter is physically unable to perform the duties of his or her employment; provided, however, that such benefits provided pursuant to this Code section for injuries resulting from a single incident shall not be granted for more than a total of 12 months. For purposes of this subsection, the regular compensation of a volunteer firefighter covered under subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of Code Section 45-9-101 shall be deemed to be the Georgia average weekly earnings of production workers in manufacturing industries for the immediately preceding calendar year as published by the Georgia Department of Labor. A law enforcement officer or firefighter shall be required to submit to the department satisfactory evidence of such disability. A volunteer firefighter shall not be considered disabled once he or she is able to perform the duties of his or her regular employment or equivalent thereof.

Benefits made available under this Code section shall be subordinate to any workers’ compensation benefits, disability and other compensation benefits from the person’s employer which the law enforcement officer or firefighter is awarded and shall be limited to the difference between the amount of workers’ compensation benefits and other compensation benefits actually paid and the amount of the law enforcement officer’s or firefighter’s regular compensation; provided, however, that benefits shall never exceed the person’s regular compensation minus the maximum weekly workers’ compensation benefit level for that person whether or not workers’ compensation is available. For the purposes of this subsection, the regular compensation of a firefighter covered under subparagraph (2)(B) of Code Section 45-9-102 shall be deemed to be the Georgia average weekly earnings of production workers in manufacturing industries for the immediately preceding calendar year as published by the Georgia Department of Labor.

A law enforcement officer or firefighter who collects benefits pursuant to this Code section shall not be entitled to any benefits under Code Section 45-7-9.

A law enforcement officer or firefighter who is disabled and who receives indemnification under Part 1 of this article as a result of an incident shall not be entitled to any compensation under this Code section for the disability resulting from the same incident. A law enforcement officer or firefighter who initially receives benefits under this Code section but who is determined subsequently to be entitled to benefits under Part 1 of this article with respect to the same incident or whose beneficiary is determined subsequently to be entitled to benefits under Part 1 of this article shall be entitled only to the amount equal to the benefits to which the person would be entitled under Part 1 reduced by the total amount of benefits received under this Code section.

After the department, or the commission upon review of a denial by the department, determines that a law enforcement officer has been temporarily disabled due to a willful act of violence or that a firefighter has been temporarily disabled while fighting a fire and is entitled to indemnification under this part, the department shall be authorized to make the appropriate payments to the temporarily disabled law enforcement officer or firefighter.

If the department denies a claim, any person seeking benefits pursuant to this part may appeal the department’s decision to the commission. Any such appeal shall be filed with the commission within 60 days of receipt of the department’s decision and shall identify the errors in the department’s decision. Appeals shall be considered by the commission at the commission’s semiannual meeting as provided in Code Section 45-9-84.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-9-103

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 283, § 2; Ga. L. 2002, p. 415, § 45; Ga. L. 2002, p. 660, § 3; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1259, § 10; Ga. L. 2003, p. 772, § 2; Code 1981, §

45-9-102

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2008, p. 470, § 1/SB 254; Ga. L. 2016, p. 846, § 45/HB 737.

The 2016 amendment,

effective May 3, 2016, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3)” for “subparagraph (2)(B)” in the second sentence of subsection (b).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, Code Section 45-9-102, as enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 768, § 2, was redesignated as Code Section 45-9-72.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2008, p. 470, § 2/SB 254, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section shall apply to all incidents occurring on or after July 1, 2008.

45-9-103.
Submission of application.

An application for compensation with respect to a claim filed on or after July 1, 2001, for the temporary disability of a law enforcement officer or firefighter shall be submitted by that person within 60 days from the date of the incident resulting in disability.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-9-104

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 283, § 2; Ga. L. 2002, p. 660, § 4(22); Ga. L. 2002, p. 1259, § 11(22); Ga. L. 2005, p. 723, § 1/HB 240; Code 1981, §

45-9-103

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2008, p. 470, § 1/SB 254.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, Code Section 45-9-103, as enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 768, § 2, was redesignated as Code Section 45-9-73.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2008, p. 470, § 2/SB 254, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section shall apply to all incidents occurring on or after July 1, 2008.

45-9-104.
Compensation not to be awarded when penal violation, intentionally self-inflicted injuries, natural causes, or performance of certain routine duties caused or contributed to disability.

No compensation shall be awarded to any person otherwise entitled thereto who violates a penal law of this state which violation caused or contributed to the disability of the law enforcement officer or firefighter.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, no payment shall be authorized if disability occurs from intentionally self-inflicted injuries or natural causes or while performing routine duties which would not be strenuous or dangerous if performed by persons of average physical abilities.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-9-105

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 283, § 2; Ga. L. 2002, p. 660, § 4(23); Ga. L. 2002, p. 1259, § 11(23); Code 1981, §

45-9-104

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2008, p. 470, § 1/SB 254.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, Code Section 45-9-104, as enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 768, § 2, was redesignated as Code Section 45-9-74.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2008, p. 470, § 2/SB 254, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section shall apply to all incidents occurring on or after July 1, 2008.

45-9-105.
Giving false information or testimony; penalty.

Any person who shall knowingly give false information or false testimony causing or intending to cause the payment of compensation which would not otherwise be justified under this part shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

Any such person convicted under subsection (a) of this Code section shall be liable to the state for any funds paid as a result of such false information or testimony.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-9-106

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 283, § 2; Code 1981, §

45-9-105

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2008, p. 470, § 1/SB 254.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, Code Section 45-9-105, as enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 768, § 2, was redesignated as Code Section 45-9-75.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2008, p. 470, § 2/SB 254, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section shall apply to all incidents occurring on or after July 1, 2008.

45-9-106.
Redesignated.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, Code Section 45-9-106, as enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 768, § 2, was redesignated as Code Section 45-9-76.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2008, p. 470, § 1/SB 254, effective July 1, 2008, redesignated former Code Section 45-9-106 as present Code Section 45-9-105.